Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Information to be Provided to Child’s Parents or Legal Guardians by Child Care Facilities

§ 43-20-81.
Information relative to risks associated with influenza and availability, effectiveness and modes of administration of influenza vaccines.

Each licensed child care facility shall, by October 1 of every year, provide each child’s parent or legal guardian with information relative to the risks associated with influenza and the availability, effectiveness and modes of administration of influenza vaccines.That information shall be updated annually to include new information and shall include the following:

The causes and symptoms of influenza and means by which influenza is transmitted;

The infection rates of influenza in children;

Information about the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s (CDC) recommendations for routine, seasonal vaccination of all children aged six (6) months through eighteen (18) years; and

Sources in which a parent or legal guardian may obtain additional information and where a child may be immunized against influenza.

The State Department of Health shall develop information on influenza immunization and provide that information to each licensed child care facility, which shall provide the information to each child’s parent or legal guardian as required by subsection (1) of this section.

The department shall determine the most cost-effective and efficient means of distributing the information.The department may work with public health organizations and vaccine stakeholders in developing and distributing the information.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any licensed child care facility to provide or pay for immunizations against influenza.However, if a licensed child care facility requests assistance in providing influenza vaccine on site to children in accordance with their parent or legal guardian’s approval, the department shall work with the licensed child care facility to provide advice and influenza vaccine for children who qualify for the vaccine through the federal Vaccines for Children (VFC) program.

The State Board of Health shall establish by rules and regulations all guidelines and procedures for carrying out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 342, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.